Texas statutes.
GOVERNMENT CODE

TITLE 2. JUDICIAL BRANCH

SUBTITLE K-1. SPECIALTY COURTS FOR VICTIM SERVICES

CHAPTER 141. SEXUAL ASSAULT VICTIM SERVICES COURT PROGRAM

Sec. 141.001. SEXUAL ASSAULT VICTIM SERVICES COURT PROGRAM DEFINED. In this chapter, "sexual assault victim services court program" means a program that has the following essential characteristics:

(1) the integration of services provided by public agencies and community organizations for victims in sexual assault cases who voluntarily agree to participate in the program;

(2) the use of prosecutors with experience in prosecuting sexual assault cases and judges with experience in hearing sexual assault cases;

(3) early identification and prompt assignment of eligible cases to the court designated under Section 141.002(b);

(4) access for victims participating in the program to counseling and other related services provided by public agencies and community organizations;

(5) development of partnerships with public agencies and community organizations;

(6) monitoring and evaluation of program goals and effectiveness;

(7) continuing interdisciplinary education to promote effective program planning, implementation, and operations;

(8) inclusion of a participant's family members who voluntarily agree to be involved in the services provided to the participant under the program;

(9) prosecution of sexual assault offenses;

(10) issuance of protective orders for victims on the victim's consent and as authorized by state law; and

(11) continued monitoring of sexual assault defendants through prosecution and adjudication and for the duration of convicted offenders' sentences.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 669 (H.B. 1706), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 141.002. AUTHORITY TO ESTABLISH PROGRAM; ELIGIBILITY. (a) The commissioners court of a county may establish a sexual assault victim services court program for participants who:

(1) are victims of an alleged sexual assault in which a person is arrested for or charged with an offense under Chapter 21 or 22, Penal Code, committed against the victim; and

(2) voluntarily agree to participate in the program.

(b) The local administrative district and statutory county court judges of the county may designate a court in the county for assignment of cases described by Subsection (a). The judge of the designated court must have experience hearing sexual assault cases under Chapter 21 or 22, Penal Code. The prosecuting attorney for the court must have experience in prosecuting sexual assault offenses under Chapter 21 or 22, Penal Code.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 669 (H.B. 1706), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 141.003. DUTIES OF SEXUAL ASSAULT VICTIM SERVICES COURT PROGRAM. (a) A sexual assault victim services court program established under this chapter must:

(1) ensure that a victim eligible for participation in the program voluntarily agrees to participate in the program; and

(2) allow a participant to withdraw from the program at any time.

(b) A sexual assault victim services court program established under this chapter shall make, establish, and publish local procedures to ensure maximum participation of eligible victims in the county.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 669 (H.B. 1706), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.

Sec. 141.004. GIFTS, GRANTS, AND DONATIONS. A county may accept a gift, grant, donation, or bequest of money, services, equipment, goods, or other tangible or intangible property from any source for the sexual assault victim services court program.

Added by Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 669 (H.B. 1706), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2021.